Utah statutes.
4-38-8.   Stewards.
(1) (a)  The commission may delegate authority to enforce its rules and this
chapter to three stewards employed by the commission at each recognized race
meet.  At least one of them shall be selected by the commission.
(b)  Stewards shall exercise reasonable and necessary authority as designated
by rules of the commission including the following:
(i)  enforce rules of the commission;
(ii)  rule on the outcome of events;
(iii)  evict from an event any person who has been convicted of bookmaking,
bribery, or attempts to alter the outcome of any race through tampering with
any animal that is not in accordance with this chapter or the rules of the
commission;
(iv)  levy fines not to exceed $2,500 for violations of rules of the
commission, which fines shall be reported daily and paid to the commission
within 48 hours of imposition and notice;
(v)  suspend licenses not to exceed one year for violations of rules of the
commission, which suspension shall be reported to the commission daily; and
(vi)  recommend that the commission impose fines or suspensions greater than
permitted by Subsections (1)(b)(iv) and (v).
(2)  If a majority of the stewards agree, they may impose fines or suspend
licenses.
(3) (a)  Any fine or license suspension imposed by a steward may be appealed
in writing to the commission within five days after its imposition.  The
commission may affirm or reverse the decision of a steward or may increase or
decrease any fine or suspension.
(b)  A fine imposed by the commission under this section or Section 4-38-9 may
not exceed $10,000.
(c)  Suspensions of a license may be for any period of time but shall be
commensurate with the seriousness of the offense.
